Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.841

Exceptional faculty awards—Name of award—Duties of institution—Use of endowment proceeds.

(1) The faculty awards are the property of the institution and may be named in honor of a donor, benefactor, or honoree of the institution, at the option of the institution. The institution shall designate the use of the award to individuals, groups, or for the improvement of faculty as a whole. The designation shall be made or renewed annually.

(2) The institution is responsible for soliciting private donations, investing and maintaining its endowment funds, administering the faculty awards, and reporting on the program to the governor, the college board, and the legislature, upon request. The institution may augment its endowment fund with additional unrestricted private donations. The principal of the invested endowment fund shall not be invaded.

(3) The proceeds from the endowment fund shall be used to pay expenses for faculty awards, which may include faculty development activities, in-service training, temporary substitute or replacement costs directly associated with faculty development programs, conferences, travel, publication and dissemination of exemplary projects; to supplement the salary of the holder or holders of a faculty award; or to pay expenses associated with the holder's program area. Funds from this program shall not be used to supplant existing faculty development funds.

[ 2000 c 127 s 1; 1991 c 238 s 65; 1990 c 29 s 4.]

NOTES:

Severability—1990 c 29: See note following RCW 28B.50.835.